Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-143
Common law; construction of act.

Nothing in the Trademark Registration Act shall adversely affect the rights or the enforcement of rights in marks acquired in good faith at any time at common law.

Laws 2000, LB 626, § 18.